de: Rutschhemmende Eigenschaft des Quiltlineals: Rutschfeste Rückseite; Rutschfeste Punkte/Griffe; Keine; Angeraute/Mattierte Rückseite; Sonstige
it: Righello per quilting con funzione antiscivolo: Supporto antiscivolo; Inserti/punti antiscivolo; Nessuno; Supporto smerigliato/satinato; Altro
ru: Противоскользящая поверхность линейки для квилтинга: Нескользящая подложка; Нескользящие точки/вставки; Нет; Шлифованная/матовая подложка; Другое
pt-PT: Característica antiderrapante da régua de acolchoado: Base antiderrapante; Pontos/pegas antiderrapantes; Nenhum; Base em lixa/fosca; Outro
nl: Quiltliniaal antislipfunctie: Antisliprug; Antislipstippen/grips; Geen; Geschuurde/matte achterkant; Overig
hu: Steppelő vonalzó csúszásgátló funkciója: Csúszásgátló hátlap; Csúszásgátló pöttyök/markolatok; Nincs; Csiszolt/matt hátlap; Egyéb
fi: Tikkausviivaimen liukumattomuus: Liukumaton tausta; Liukumattomat pisteet/otepinnat; Ei mitään; Hiottu/huurrettu tausta; Muu
pt-BR: Régua para quilting recurso antiderrapante: Fundo antiderrapante; Pontos/alças antiderrapantes; Nenhum; Fundo lixado/fosco; Outro
lt-LT: Skiautinių liniuotės neslystanti savybė: Neslystanti nugarėlė; Neslystantys taškai / sukibimo elementai; Nėra; Šlifuota / matinė nugarėlė; Kita
es: Función antideslizante de la regla para acolchado: Reverso antideslizante; Puntos/agarres antideslizantes; Ninguna; Reverso lijado/esmerilado; Otra
sk-SK: Protišmykový prvok prešívacieho pravítka: Protišmyková zadná strana; Protišmykové body/úchyty; Žiadne; Brúsená/matná zadná strana; Iné
fr: Dispositif antidérapant de la règle de patchwork: Support antidérapant; Points/pastilles antidérapants; Aucun; Support poncé/givré; Autre
ro-RO: Riglă de matlasare antiderapantă: Suport antiderapant; Puncte/elemente de prindere antiderapante; Niciunul; Suport mat/cu aspect de șmirghel; Altele
da: Quiltelineals skridsikre funktion: Skridsikker bagside; Skridsikre prikker/greb; Ingen; Sandpapirsbelagt/frostet bagside; Andet
sl-SI: Protizdrsna lastnost ravnila za prešivanje: Nedrseča hrbtna stran; Nedrseče pike/oprijemala; Brez; Brušena/matirana hrbtna stran; Drugo
hr-HR: Protivklizna značajka ravnala za prošivanje: Protuklizna poleđina; Protuklizne točkice/hvatišta; Nijedno; Brušena/matirana poleđina; Ostalo
el: Αντιολισθητική λειτουργία χάρακα quilting: Αντιολισθητική επένδυση; Αντιολισθητικές κουκκίδες/λαβές; Κανένα; Επένδυση από γυαλόχαρτο/αμμοβολή; Άλλο
pl: Funkcja antypoślizgowa linijki do patchworku: Podkład antypoślizgowy; Kropki / uchwyty antypoślizgowe; Brak; Podkład ścierny / matowy; Inne
tr: Dikiş cetveli kaymaz özelliği: Kaymaz taban; Kaymaz noktalar/tutamaklar; Yok; Zımparalanmış/Buzlu taban; Diğer
sv: Halkfri funktion för quiltningslinjal: Halkfri baksida; Halkfria prickar/grepp; Ingen; Sandpapprad/frostad baksida; Övrigt
th: ไม้บรรทัดเย็บผ้าควิลท์แบบกันลื่น: ด้านหลังกันลื่น; จุด/ยางจับกันลื่น; ไม่มี; ด้านหลังแบบเนื้อทราย/เนื้อด้าน; อื่นๆ
ja: キルティング定規の滑り止め機能: 滑り止め裏地; 滑り止めドット/グリップ; なし; サンドペーパー/フロスト裏地; その他
nb: Sklisikker funksjon for stikksømlinjal: Sklisikker bakside; Sklisikre prikker/grep; Ingen; Pusset/frostet bakside; Annet
zh-TW: 拼布尺防滑特色: 防滑背襯; 防滑點/防滑墊; 無; 磨砂/霧面背襯; 其他
cs: Protiskluzová funkce prošívacího pravítka: Protiskluzová zadní strana; Protiskluzové body/úchyty; Žádná; Pískovaná/matná zadní strana; Jiné
vi: Thước may chần bông có tính năng chống trượt: Mặt sau chống trượt; Chấm/đệm chống trượt; Không có; Mặt sau nhám/mờ; Khác
zh-CN: 绗缝尺防滑功能: 防滑底背; 防滑点/抓力点; 无; 砂纸/磨砂背衬; 其他
en: Quilting ruler non-slip feature: Non-slip backing; Non-slip dots/grips; None; Sandpapered/frosted backing; Other
ko: 퀼팅 자의 미끄럼 방지 기능: 미끄럼 방지 후면; 미끄럼 방지 도트/그립; 없음; 샌드페이퍼/반투명 후면; 기타
bg-BG: Неплъзгаща функция на линия за капитониране: Неплъзгащ се гръб; Неплъзгащи се точки/дръжки; Няма; Матиран/грапав гръб; Друго